Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 179.505 is amended to read:
179.505. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disclosure”  means the release of, transfer of, provision of access to or divulgence in any
other manner of information outside the health care services provider holding the information.
(b) “Health care services provider” means:
(A) Medical personnel or other staff employed by or under contract with a public  provider to
provide health care or maintain written accounts of health care provided to individuals; or
(B) Units, programs or services designated, operated or maintained by a public provider to pro-
vide health care or maintain written accounts of health care provided to individuals.
(c) “Individually identifiable health information” means any health information that is:
(A) Created or received by a health care services provider; and
(B) Identifiable to an individual, including demographic information that identifies the individ-
ual, or for which  there is a reasonable basis to believe the information can be used to identify an
individual, and that relates to:
(i) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(ii) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(iii) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(d) “Personal representative” includes but is not limited to:
(A) A person appointed as a guardian under ORS 125.305, 419B.372, 419C.481 or  419C.555 with
authority to make medical and health care decisions;
(B) A person appointed as a health care representative under ORS  127.505 to 127.660 or a rep-
resentative under ORS 127.700 to 127.737 to make health care decisions or mental  health treatment
decisions;  and
(C) A person appointed as a personal representative under ORS chapter 113.
(e) “Psychotherapy notes” means notes recorded in any medium:
(A) By a mental health professional, in the  performance of the official duties of the mental
health professional;
(B) Documenting or analyzing the contents of conversation during a counseling session; and
(C) That are maintained separately from the rest of the individual’s record.
(f) “Psychotherapy notes” does not mean notes documenting:
Enrolled House Bill 2915 (HB 2915-INTRO) Page 1
(A) Medication prescription and monitoring;
(B) Counseling session start and stop times;
(C) Modalities and frequencies of treatment furnished;
(D) Results of clinical tests; or
(E) Any summary of the following items:
(i) Diagnosis;
(ii) Functional status;
(iii) Treatment plan;
(iv) Symptoms;
(v) Prognosis; or
(vi) Progress to date.
(g) “Public provider” means:
(A) The Oregon State Hospital campuses;
(B) Department of Corrections institutions as defined in ORS 421.005;
(C) A  contractor of the Department of Corrections or the Oregon Health Authority that provides
health care to individuals residing in a state institution operated by the agencies;
(D) A  community mental health program or community developmental disabilities program as
described in ORS 430.610 to 430.695 and the public and private entities with which  it contracts to
provide mental health or developmental disabilities programs or services;
(E) A program or service provided under ORS 431.001 to 431.550 and 431.990;
(F) A community mental health program or service  established or maintained under ORS 430.630
or a community developmental disabilities program described in ORS 430.620 (1)(a) or (c);
(G) A program or facility providing an organized full-day or part-day program  of treatment that
is licensed,  approved, established, maintained or operated by or contracted with the Oregon Health
Authority for alcoholism, drug addiction or mental or emotional disturbance;
(H) A program or service providing treatment by appointment that is licensed,  approved, estab-
lished, maintained or operated by or contracted  with the authority for alcoholism, drug addiction
or mental or emotional disturbance; or
(I) The impaired health professional program established under ORS 676.190.
(h) “Written account” means records  containing only individually identifiable health informa-
tion.
(2) Except as provided in  subsections (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), (9), (11), (12), (14), (15), (16), (17) and (18)
of this section or unless  otherwise permitted or required by state or federal law or by order of the
court, written accounts of the individuals served by any health care services provider  maintained
in or by the health care services provider by the officers or  employees thereof who are authorized
to maintain written accounts within the official scope of  their duties are not subject to access and
may not be disclosed. This subsection applies to  written accounts maintained in or by facilities of
the Department of Corrections only to the  extent that the written accounts concern the medical,
dental or psychiatric treatment as patients of those under the jurisdiction of the Department of
Corrections.
(3) If  the individual or a personal representative of the individual provides an authorization, the
content of any written account referred  to in subsection (2) of this section must be disclosed ac-
cordingly, if the authorization is in writing and is  signed and dated by the individual or the personal
representative of the individual and sets forth with specificity the following:
(a) Name of the health care services provider authorized to  make the disclosure, except when
the authorization is provided by recipients of or applicants for public assistance  or medical assist-
ance, as defined in ORS 414.025, to a governmental entity  for purposes of determining eligibility for
benefits or investigating for fraud;
(b) Name  or title of the persons or organizations to which the information is to be disclosed or
that information may be disclosed to the public;
(c) Name of the individual;
(d) Extent or nature of the information to be disclosed; and
Enrolled House Bill 2915 (HB 2915-INTRO) Page 2
(e) Statement  that the authorization is subject to revocation at any time except to the extent
that action has been taken in  reliance thereon, and a specification of the date, event or condition
upon which  it expires without express revocation. However, a revocation of an authorization is not
valid with respect to inspection  or records necessary to validate expenditures by or on behalf of
governmental entities.
(4) The content of any written account referred to in subsection (2) of  this section may be dis-
closed without an authorization:
(a) To any person to the extent necessary to meet a medical emergency.
(b) At  the discretion of the responsible officer of the health care services provider, which in the
case of any Oregon Health Authority facility or community mental health program is the  Director
of the Oregon  Health Authority, to persons engaged in scientific research, program evaluation, peer
review and fiscal audits. However, individual identities may not be disclosed  to such persons, except
when the disclosure is essential to the research, evaluation,  review or audit and is consistent with
state and federal law.
(c) To governmental agencies when necessary to secure compensation  for services rendered in
the treatment of the individual.
(d) To the Psychiatric Security  Review Board, for an individual who is presently under
the jurisdiction of the board and conditionally  released to the Department of Corrections,
as provided in ORS 161.336 and in the manner described in the conditional release order.
(5) When an individual’s identity  is disclosed under subsection (4) of this section, a health care
services provider shall prepare, and include in the permanent  records of the health care services
provider, a written statement indicating the  reasons for the disclosure, the written accounts dis-
closed and the recipients of the disclosure.
(6) The content of any written account referred to in subsection (2)  of this section and held by
a health care services provider currently engaged  in the treatment of an individual may be disclosed
to officers or employees of that provider, its agents or cooperating health care services  providers
who are  currently acting within the official scope of their duties to evaluate treatment programs,
to diagnose or treat or to assist  in diagnosing or treating an individual when the written account
is to be used in the course of diagnosing  or treating the individual. Nothing in this subsection
prevents the transfer of written accounts referred to  in subsection (2) of this section among health
care services providers, the Department of Corrections, the Oregon Health Authority or  a local
correctional facility when the transfer is necessary or beneficial to the treatment of an individual.
(7) When an action, suit,  claim, arbitration or proceeding is brought under ORS 34.105 to 34.240
or 34.310 to 34.730 and involves a claim  of constitutionally inadequate medical care, diagnosis or
treatment, or is brought under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 and involves the Department of  Corrections or
an institution operated by the  department, nothing in this section prohibits the disclosure of any
written account referred to in subsection (2) of this section to the Department of  Justice, Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  or their agents, upon request, or the subsequent disclosure
to a court, administrative hearings officer, arbitrator or other administrative decision maker.
(8)(a) When an action, suit, claim, arbitration or proceeding involves  the Oregon Health Au-
thority or an institution operated by the authority, nothing in this section prohibits the  disclosure
of any written account referred to in subsection (2) of this  section to the Department of Justice,
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, or their agents.
(b) Disclosure of information in an action, suit, claim,  nonlabor arbitration or proceeding is
limited by the  relevancy restrictions of ORS 40.010 to 40.585, 183.710 to 183.730, 183.745 and 183.750
and ORS chapter  183. Only written accounts of a plaintiff, claimant or petitioner shall be disclosed
under this paragraph.
(c) Disclosure of information  as part of a labor arbitration or proceeding to support a personnel
action taken against  staff is limited to written accounts directly relating to alleged action or in-
action by staff for which the personnel action was imposed.
(9)(a) The copy of  any written account referred to in subsection (2) of this section, upon written
request of the  individual or a personal representative of the individual, shall be disclosed to the
Enrolled House Bill 2915 (HB 2915-INTRO) Page 3
individual or the personal  representative of the individual within a reasonable time not to exceed
five working days. The  individual or the personal representative of the individual shall have the
right to timely access to any written accounts.
(b) If the disclosure of psychiatric or psychological  information contained in the written account
would constitute an immediate and grave detriment to the treatment  of the individual, disclosure
may be denied, if medically  contraindicated by the treating physician or a licensed health care
professional in the written account of the individual.
(c) The Department of Corrections may withhold psychiatric or psychological information if:
(A) The information relates to an individual other than the individual seeking it.
(B) Disclosure of the information would constitute a danger to another individual.
(C) Disclosure of the information would compromise the privacy of a confidential source.
(d) However, a written statement of the denial under paragraph (c) of  this subsection and the
reasons therefor must be entered in the written account.
(10) A health care services provider may require a person requesting disclosure  of the contents
of a written account under this section to reimburse the provider for the reasonable costs incurred
in searching  files, abstracting if requested and copying if requested. However, an individual or a
personal representative of the individual may not be denied access to written accounts  concerning
the individual because of inability to pay.
(11) A written account referred to in subsection (2) of this section may not be used to  initiate
or substantiate any criminal, civil, administrative, legislative  or other proceedings conducted by
federal, state  or local authorities against the individual or to conduct any investigations of the in-
dividual. If the individual, as a party to an action, suit or other  judicial proceeding, voluntarily
produces evidence regarding an issue to which  a written account referred to in subsection (2) of this
section would be relevant, the  contents of that written account may be disclosed for use in the
proceeding.
(12) Information obtained in the course of diagnosis, evaluation or  treatment of an individual
that, in the professional judgment of the health care services  provider, indicates a clear and imme-
diate danger to others or to society may be reported to the appropriate  authority. A decision not
to disclose information under this subsection does  not subject the provider to any civil liability.
Nothing in this subsection may be construed to alter the provisions  of ORS 124.088, 146.750, 146.760,
419B.010, 419B.015, 419B.020, 419B.025, 419B.030, 419B.035, 419B.040, 419B.045, 430.738 or 441.674.
(13) The prohibitions of  this section apply to written accounts concerning any individual who
has been  treated by any health care services provider irrespective of whether or when the individual
ceases to receive treatment.
(14) Persons other than the individual or  the personal representative of the individual who are
granted access under this  section to the contents of a written account referred to in subsection (2)
of this  section may not disclose the contents of the written account to any other person except in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(15) Nothing in this section prevents the Department of Human Services  or the Oregon Health
Authority from disclosing the contents of written accounts  in its possession to individuals or agen-
cies with whom children in its custody are placed.
(16) The system described  in ORS 192.517 (1) shall have access to records, as defined in ORS
192.515, as provided in ORS 192.517.
(17)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a health care services provider
must obtain an authorization from an individual or a personal  representative of the individual to
disclose psychotherapy notes.
(b) A health care  services provider may use or disclose psychotherapy notes without obtaining
an authorization from  the individual or a personal representative of the individual to carry out the
following treatment, payment and health care operations:
(A) Use by the originator of the psychotherapy notes for treatment;
Enrolled House Bill 2915 (HB 2915-INTRO) Page 4
(B) Disclosure by the health care services provider for its own training program in  which stu-
dents, trainees  or practitioners in mental health learn under supervision to practice or improve their
skills in group, joint, family or individual counseling; or
(C) Disclosure by the  health care services provider to defend itself in a legal action or other
proceeding brought by the individual or a personal representative of the individual.
(c) An authorization for the disclosure of psychotherapy notes may not be combined  with an
authorization for a disclosure  of any other individually identifiable health information, but may be
combined with another authorization for a disclosure of psychotherapy notes.
(18) A health care services provider may disclose information contained in a written account  if
the conditions of ORS 192.567 (1) to (5) or 192.577 are met.
Passed by House March 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2915 (HB 2915-INTRO) Page 5